Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 5. Solemnization.

Collateral references. —

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Marriage, §§ 35, 36.

55 C.J.S., Marriage, §§ 30-34.

Sec. 25.05.261.
Who may solemnize.

Marriages may be solemnized

by a minister, priest, or rabbi of any church or congregation in the state, or by a commissioned officer of the Salvation Army, or by the principal officer or elder of recognized churches or congregations that traditionally do not have regular ministers, priests, or rabbis, anywhere within the state;

by a marriage commissioner or judicial officer of the state anywhere within the jurisdiction of the commissioner or officer;

before or in any religious organization or congregation according to the established ritual or form commonly practiced in the organization or congregation; or

by an individual holding an elective public office in the state.

This section may not be construed to waive the requirements for obtaining a marriage license.

Nothing in this section creates or implies a duty or obligation on a person authorized to solemnize a marriage under (a)(1), (3), or (4) of this section to solemnize any marriage.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am §§ 1, 2 ch 20 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 11, 2018, added (a)(4), and made a related change; added (c).

Sec. 25.05.270.
Failure of licensing officer to keep records or permit inspection. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.271.
Duty of officiating person before ceremony.

The officiating person shall determine that the parties presenting themselves to be married are the parties named in the license.
If the officiating person knows of a legal impediment to the marriage, the officiating person may not perform the ceremony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.280.
Action to recover fine or forfeiture. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.281.
Marriage solemnized by unauthorized person.

After a license has been obtained, a marriage solemnized before a person professing to be a person authorized to solemnize marriages in the state under AS

25.05.261(a)

is valid regardless of a lack of power or authority in the person, if the marriage is consummated with a belief on the part of the persons so married, or either of them, that they have been lawfully joined in marriage.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 20 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For penalty for solemnization of marriage by unauthorized person, see AS

25.05.371

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 11, 2018, substituted “person authorized to solemnize marriages in the state under AS

25.05.261(a)

” for “minister, priest, or rabbi of a church or congregation in the state or a judicial officer or marriage commissioner” following “person professing to be a”.

Collateral references. —

Validity of marriage as affected by lack of legal authority of person solemnizing it, 13 ALR4th 1323.

Sec. 25.05.291.
Civil and religious ceremonies.

When a religious ceremony between two parties follows a civil ceremony between them, one license is sufficient for both ceremonies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.301.
Form of solemnization.

In the solemnization of marriage no particular form is required except that the parties shall assent or declare in the presence of each other and the person solemnizing the marriage and in the presence of at least two competent witnesses that they take each other to be husband and wife.
A competent witness for this purpose is a person of sound mind capable of understanding the seriousness of the ceremony.
At the time of the ceremony, the person solemnizing the marriage shall complete the certification on the original marriage certificate.
The person solemnizing the marriage and the two attending witnesses shall sign the original marriage certificate and the necessary copies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.311.
Marriage without solemnization.

A marriage contracted after January 1, 1964, is void unless the marriage has been solemnized as provided in this chapter. If the parties to a marriage void for failure to solemnize the marriage validate the marriage by complying with the requirements of this chapter, the issue of the void marriage are legitimate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.321.
Certificates.

The person solemnizing the marriage shall, on the forms provided by the bureau, complete two short-form certificates, and, after that person and the two witnesses have signed them, give one to each of the parties to the marriage. A church or congregation may design and furnish its own form for this purpose, containing as a minimum the items contained in the form furnished by the bureau. The original marriage certificate shall be filed as required by AS 18.50 (Vital Statistics Act) and regulations adopted under it. The person solemnizing the marriage shall complete the certificate as required and submit it to the local registrar within seven days of the date the marriage is solemnized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 9 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.